Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1034.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 207. Payments for Utility Services.--A landlord that requires a tenant to make payments for water, sewer, gas or electric utility services directly to the landlord shall:(1) Use a written lease that provides notice that the tenant is responsible for making payments for water, sewer, gas or electric utility services directly to the landlord.(2) Within five days of a request by the tenant, provide a 12345678910111213141516171819 copy of the bill for water, sewer, gas or electric utility services to the tenant.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1034PN1118 - 2 - 123